Maine, session 132, LD1527.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §752, first ¶, as amended by PL 1985, c. 357, §8, is further
amended to read:
At least 3 months before any election, the Secretary of State shall furnish each
municipality with a reasonable number of dated absentee ballot applications. A reasonable
time, not less than 30 days unless an emergency exists, before any election, the Secretary
of State shall furnish each municipality with a reasonable number of absentee ballots and
postage prepaid return envelopes.